Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1340.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 510.2(1)(xiii) of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended to read:Section 510.2. Publication of Rules, Regulations and Policies.--The board of school directors of a school district shall post on its publicly accessible Internet website the following rules, regulations and policies to the extent that they are required to be adopted by the school district under Federal or State law:(1) The following relating to students:* * *123456789101112131415161718192021 (xiii) Participation by home school students in school district extracurricular activities, including Junior Reserve Officer Training Corps.* * *Section 2. Section 1327.1 of the act is amended by adding subsections to read:Section 1327.1. Home Education Program.--* * *(o) Any parent who is a member or a spouse of a member of the armed forces of the United States who moves into a school district or begins home instruction after the school year has begun shall notify the school district of residence of his or her intention to provide home instruction as soon as practicable and comply with the requirements within thirty (30) days of the notice.(p) Each school district of residence shall ensure that any Junior Reserve Officers' Training Corps program offered by any branch of the armed forces of the United States in any school in the local school division is open to any student who resides in the school district in the attendance zone of the school, receives home instruction or attends a private school and meets all eligibility requirements for participation in the program.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1340PN1732 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122